Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska82-333
Nebraska Arts and Humanities Cash
Fund; report.

The Nebraska Arts Council shall report to the
Clerk of the Legislature and Director of Administrative Services annually
regarding disbursements from the Nebraska Arts and Humanities Cash Fund. The report submitted to the Clerk of the
Legislature shall be submitted electronically. The report shall
include a complete listing of the uses of the fund, the sources of funding
used to match state funds, the amount of investment earnings credited to the
Nebraska Arts and Humanities Cash Fund, and the balance of the Nebraska Arts
and Humanities Cash Fund. The report shall cover the period July 1 through
June 30 and shall be submitted no later than November 1 of each year.

Laws 1998, LB 799, § 4;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 216.